Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3D-108] Confidentiality. (a) Documents,
materials, or other information, including the own risk and solvency assessment
summary report, in the possession or control of the commissioner that are obtained
by, created by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person under this
article are recognized as proprietary and containing trade secrets.

All such documents, materials, or other information
shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be disclosable under chapter
92F, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or
admissible in evidence in any private civil action.

The commissioner is authorized to use the documents,
materials, or other information to further any regulatory or legal action brought
as a part of the commissioner's official duties. The commissioner shall not otherwise
make the documents, materials, or other information public without prior written
consent of the insurer.

(b) Neither the commissioner nor any person who
received documents, materials, or other own risk and solvency assessment information
through examination or otherwise, while acting under the authority of the commissioner
or with whom such documents, materials, or other information are shared pursuant
to this article, shall be permitted or required to testify in any private civil
action concerning any confidential documents, materials, or information subject
to subsection (a).

(c) To assist in performing the commissioner's
regulatory duties, the commissioner:

(1) May, upon request, share information subject to
subsection (a) and proprietary and trade secret documents with:

(A) Other state, federal, and international financial
regulatory agencies; and

(B) Members of any supervisory college
referred to in section 431:11-107.5, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners,
and any third-party consultants designated by the commissioner;

provided that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain
the confidentiality and privileged status of the own risk and solvency assessment
documents, materials, or other information and has verified in writing the legal
authority to maintain confidentiality;

(2) May receive information subject to subsection (a)
and proprietary and trade secret documents from regulatory officials of other foreign
or domestic jurisdictions, including members of any supervisory college
referred to in section 431:11-107.5, and the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
The commissioner shall maintain as confidential or privileged any documents, materials,
or information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential
or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document,
material, or information; and

(3) Shall enter into a written agreement with the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners or a third-party consultant governing sharing
and use of information provided pursuant to this article and consistent with this
subsection, which shall:

(A) Specify procedures and protocols regarding
the confidentiality and security of information shared with the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners or a third-party consultant pursuant to this article,
including procedures and protocols for sharing by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners with other state regulators from states in which the insurance group
has domiciled insurers. The agreement shall provide that the recipient agrees to
maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the own risk and solvency
assessment documents, materials, or other information and has verified in writing
the legal authority to maintain confidentiality;

(B) Specify that ownership of information shared
with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or a third-party consultant
pursuant to this article remains with the commissioner and that use of the information
by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or a third-party consultant
is subject to the direction of the commissioner;

(C) Prohibit the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners or third-party consultant from storing the information shared pursuant
to this article in a permanent database after the underlying analysis is completed;

(D) Require prompt notice to be given to an insurer
whose confidential information in the possession of the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners or a third-party consultant pursuant to this article is
subject to a request or subpoena to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners
or a third-party consultant for disclosure or production;

(E) Require the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners or a third-party consultant to consent to intervention by an insurer
in any judicial or administrative action in which the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners or a third-party consultant may be required to disclose confidential
information about the insurer shared with the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners or a third-party consultant pursuant to this article; and

(F) In the case of an agreement involving a third-party
consultant, provide for the insurer's written consent.

(d) The sharing of information and documents by
the commissioner pursuant to this article shall not constitute a delegation of regulatory
authority or rulemaking, and the commissioner is solely responsible for the administration,
execution, and enforcement of the provisions of this article.

(e) No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim
of confidentiality in the documents, proprietary, and trade secret materials or
other own risk and solvency assessment information shall occur as a result of
disclosing any own risk and solvency assessment information or documents to the
commissioner pursuant to this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in
this article.

(f) Documents, materials, or other information
in the possession or control of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners
or a third-party consultant pursuant to this article shall be confidential by law
and privileged, shall not be subject to chapter 92F, shall not be subject to subpoena,
and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil
action. [L 2016, c 140, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next